Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8228
Regional medical director, defined.

Regional medical director means a physician licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 62;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 689;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1303;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 102.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.